Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1716
Membership shares, defined.

Membership shares shall mean a balance held by a credit union and established by a member in accordance with standards specified by the credit union. Each member may own only one membership share. Ownership of a membership share shall represent an interest in the capital of the credit union upon dissolution or conversion to another type of institution.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 16.